Washington statutes.
RCW 43.81.030

Rent—Custodial housekeeping—Damages.

(1) No rent may be charged to persons living in facilities provided under RCW 43.81.020(1). Such employees shall pay the costs of utilities associated with the living facility.

(2) Any person occupying state-owned or leased living facilities shall do so with the understanding that he or she assumes custodial housekeeping responsibility as directed by the agency. Such responsibility shall not include maintenance, repairs, or improvements to the facilities. An occupant of a state-owned or leased facility is liable for damages to the facility in excess of normal wear and tear.

[ 1989 c 11 s 16; 1985 c 463 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.